test/src/gt-norm-yamls/U-all_gt-norm.yaml
     nipâw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+1Sg: nipâyâni
     nipâw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+2Sg: nipâyani
     nipâw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+3Sg: nipâci
     nipâw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+4Sg: nipâyici
     nipâw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+1Pl: nipâyâhki
     nipâw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+12Pl: nipâyahko
     nipâw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+2Pl: nipâyêko
     nipâw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+3Pl: nipâtwâwi
     nipâw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+4Pl: nipâyici

     nipâw+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: nipâ
     nipâw+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Pl: nipâk
     nipâw+V+AI+Imp+Imm+12Pl: nipâtân
     
     nipâw+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Sg: nipâhkan
     nipâw+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Pl: nipâhkêk
     nipâw+V+AI+Imp+Del+12Pl: nipâhkahk
     
     
  
  Verb - pimisin - lie down : # Ordinary VAI verb,  

     pimisin+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: pimisini
     pimisin+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Pl: pimisinik
     pimisin+V+AI+Imp+Imm+12Pl: pimisinîtân
     pimisin+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Sg: pimisinîhkan
     pimisin+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Pl: pimisinîhkêk
     pimisin+V+AI+Imp+Del+12Pl: pimisinîhkahk
    
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prs+1Sg: nipimisinin
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prs+2Sg: kipimisinin
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prs+3Sg: pimisin
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prs+4Sg: pimisiniyiwa
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prs+1Pl: nipimisininân
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prs+12Pl: [kipimisininaw, kipimisininânaw]
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prs+2Pl: kipimisininâwâw
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prs+3Pl: pimisinwak
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prs+4Pl: pimisiniyiwa
     
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prt+1Sg: [nikî-pimisinin, nikîpimisinin] 
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prt+2Sg: [kikî-pimisinin, kikîpimisinin]
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [kî-pimisin, kîpimisin]
     
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+1Sg: [nika-pimisinin, nikapimisinin]
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg: [kika-pimisinin, kikapimisinin]
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+3Sg: [ka-pimisin, kapimisin]
     
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg: [niwî-pimisinin, niwîpimisinin]
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg: [kiwî-pimisinin, kiwîpimisinin]
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+3Sg: [wî-pimisin, wîpimisin]
     
     pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+1Sg: [ê-pimisiniyân, êpimisiniyân]
     pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+2Sg: [ê-pimisiniyan, êpimisiniyan]
     pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+3Sg: [ê-pimisihk, êpimisihk]
     pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+4Sg: [ê-pimisiniyit, êpimisiniyit]
     pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+1Pl: [ê-pimisiniyâhk, êpimisiniyâhk]
     pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+12Pl: [ê-pimisiniyahk, êpimisiniyahk]
     pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+2Pl: [ê-pimisiniyêk, êpimisiniyêk]
     pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+3Pl: [ê-pimisihkik, êpimisihkik]

     pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+1Sg: [ê-kîpimisiniyân, ê-kî-pimisiniyân, êkî-pimisiniyân, êkîpimisiniyân]
     
     
     
  
  Verb - mâyâtan -  adsf : # Ordinary VII verb, Wolvengrey VII1 p 393

     mâyâtan+V+II: mâyâtan
     mâyâtan+V+II+Ind+Prs+3Sg: mâyâtan
     mâyâtan+V+II+Ind+Prs+4Sg: mâyâtaniyiw
     mâyâtan+V+II+Ind+Prs+3Pl: mâyâtanwa
     mâyâtan+V+II+Ind+Prs+4Pl: mâyâtaniyiwa

     mâyâtan+V+II+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [kîmâyâtan, kî-mâyâtan]
     mâyâtan+V+II+Ind+Prt+4Sg: [kîmâyâtaniyiw, kî-mâyâtaniyiw]
     mâyâtan+V+II+Ind+Prt+3Pl: [kîmâyâtanwa, kî-mâyâtanwa]
     mâyâtan+V+II+Ind+Prt+4Pl: [kîmâyâtaniyiwa, kî-mâyâtaniyiwa]

     mâyâtan+V+II+Cnj+Prs+3Sg: [êmâyâtahk, ê-mâyâtahk]
     mâyâtan+V+II+Cnj+Prs+4Sg: [êmâyâtaniyik, ê-mâyâtaniyik]
     mâyâtan+V+II+Cnj+Prs+3Pl: [êmâyâtahki, ê-mâyâtahki]
     mâyâtan+V+II+Cnj+Prs+4Pl: [êmâyâtaniyiki, ê-mâyâtaniyiki]
     mâyâtan+V+II+Cnj+Prt+3Sg: [êkîmâyâtahk, êkî-mâyâtahk, ê-kîmâyâtahk, ê-kî-mâyâtahk]
     mâyâtan+V+II+Cnj+Prt+4Sg: [êkîmâyâtaniyik, êkî-mâyâtaniyik, ê-kîmâyâtaniyik, ê-kî-mâyâtaniyik]

     mâyâtan+V+II+Cnj+Prt+3Pl: [êkîmâyâtahki, êkî-mâyâtahki, ê-kîmâyâtahki, ê-kî-mâyâtahki]
     mâyâtan+V+II+Cnj+Prt+4Pl: [êkîmâyâtaniyiki, êkî-mâyâtaniyiki, ê-kîmâyâtaniyiki, ê-kî-mâyâtaniyiki]

     mâyâtan+V+II+Fut+Cond+3Sg: mâyâtan
     mâyâtan+V+II+Fut+Cond+4Sg: mâyâtaniyiw
     mâyâtan+V+II+Fut+Cond+3Pl: mâyâtanwa
     mâyâtan+V+II+Fut+Cond+4Pl: mâyâtaniyiwa

  
  Verb - mihkwâw - ok : # Ordinary VII base on Wolvengrey
     mihkwâw+V+II: mihkwâw
     mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+Prs+3Sg: mihkwâw
     mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+Prs+3Pl: mihkwâwa
     mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+Prs+4Sg: mihkwâyiw
     mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+Prs+4Pl: mihkwâyiwa

     mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [kî-mihkwâw, kîmihkwâw]
     mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+Prt+3Pl: [kî-mihkwâwa, kîmihkwâwa]
     mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+Prt+4Sg: [kî-mihkwâyiw, kîmihkwâyiw]
     mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+Prt+4Pl: [kî-mihkwâyiwa, kîmihkwâyiwa]


     mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+Prs+3Sg: [ê-mihkwâk, êmihkwâk]
     mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+Prs+3Pl: [ê-mihkwâki, êmihkwâki]
     mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+Prs+4Sg: [ê-mihkwâyik, êmihkwâyik]
     mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+Prs+4Pl: [ê-mihkwâyiki, êmihkwâyiki]

     mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+Prt+3Sg: [ê-kî-mihkwâk, êkîmihkwâk, ê-kîmihkwâk, êkî-mihkwâk]
     mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+Prt+3Pl: [ê-kî-mihkwâki, êkîmihkwâki, ê-kîmihkwâki, êkî-mihkwâki]
     mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+Prt+4Sg: [ê-kî-mihkwâyik, êkîmihkwâyik, ê-kîmihkwâyik, êkî-mihkwâyik]
     mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+Prt+4Pl: [ê-kî-mihkwâyiki, êkîmihkwâyiki, ê-kîmihkwâyiki, êkî-mihkwâyiki]

  
  Verb - miywasin - ok : # Ordinary VII base on Wolvengrey
     miywâsin+V+II: miywâsin
     miywâsin+V+II+Ind+Prs+3Sg: miywâsin
     miywâsin+V+II+Ind+Prs+3Pl: miywâsinwa
     miywâsin+V+II+Ind+Prs+4Sg: miywâsiniyiw
     miywâsin+V+II+Ind+Prs+4Pl: miywâsiniyiwa

     miywâsin+V+II+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [kî-miywâsin, kîmiywâsin]
     miywâsin+V+II+Ind+Prt+3Pl: [kî-miywâsinwa, kîmiywâsinwa]
     miywâsin+V+II+Ind+Prt+4Sg: [kî-miywâsiniyiw, kîmiywâsiniyiw]
     miywâsin+V+II+Ind+Prt+4Pl: [kî-miywâsiniyiwa, kîmiywâsiniyiwa]


     miywâsin+V+II+Cnj+Prs+3Sg: [ê-miywâsik, êmiywâsik]
     miywâsin+V+II+Cnj+Prs+3Pl: [ê-miywâsiki, êmiywâsiki]
     miywâsin+V+II+Cnj+Prs+4Sg: [ê-miywâsiniyik, êmiywâsiniyik]
     miywâsin+V+II+Cnj+Prs+4Pl: [ê-miywâsiniyiki, êmiywâsiniyiki]

     miywâsin+V+II+Cnj+Prt+3Sg: [ê-kî-miywâsik, êkîmiywâsik, ê-kîmiywâsik, êkî-miywâsik]
     miywâsin+V+II+Cnj+Prt+3Pl: [ê-kî-miywâsiki, êkîmiywâsiki, ê-kîmiywâsiki, êkî-miywâsiki]
     miywâsin+V+II+Cnj+Prt+4Sg: [ê-kî-miywâsiniyik, êkîmiywâsiniyik, ê-kîmiywâsiniyik, êkî-miywâsiniyik]
     miywâsin+V+II+Cnj+Prt+4Pl: [ê-kî-miywâsiniyiki, êkîmiywâsiniyiki, ê-kîmiywâsiniyiki, êkî-miywâsiniyiki]

  
  Verb - pimâmon - adsf : #  VII2on acc. Wolvengrey p. 394
  
     pimâmon+V+II: pimâmon
     pimâmon+V+II+Ind+Prs+3Sg: pimâmon
     pimâmon+V+II+Ind+Prs+3Pl: pimâmonwa
     pimâmon+V+II+Ind+Prs+4Sg: pimâmoniyiw
     pimâmon+V+II+Ind+Prs+4Pl: pimâmoniyiwa

     pimâmon+V+II+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [kîpimâmon, kî-pimâmon]
     pimâmon+V+II+Ind+Prt+3Pl: [kîpimâmonwa, kî-pimâmonwa]
     pimâmon+V+II+Ind+Prt+4Sg: [kîpimâmoniyiw, kî-pimâmoniyiw]
     pimâmon+V+II+Ind+Prt+4Pl: [kîpimâmoniyiwa, kî-pimâmoniyiwa]

     pimâmon+V+II+Cnj+Prs+3Sg: [êpimâmok, ê-pimâmok]
     pimâmon+V+II+Cnj+Prs+3Pl: [êpimâmoki, ê-pimâmoki]
     pimâmon+V+II+Cnj+Prs+4Sg: [êpimâmoniyik, ê-pimâmoniyik]
     pimâmon+V+II+Cnj+Prs+4Pl: [êpimâmoniyiki, ê-pimâmoniyiki]

     pimâmon+V+II+Cnj+Prt+3Sg: [êkîpimâmok, êkî-pimâmok, ê-kîpimâmok, ê-kî-pimâmok]
     pimâmon+V+II+Cnj+Prt+3Pl: [êkîpimâmoki, êkî-pimâmoki, ê-kîpimâmoki, ê-kî-pimâmoki]
     pimâmon+V+II+Cnj+Prt+4Sg: [êkîpimâmoniyik, êkî-pimâmoniyik, ê-kîpimâmoniyik,  ê-kî-pimâmoniyik]
     pimâmon+V+II+Cnj+Prt+4Pl: [êkîpimâmoniyiki, êkî-pimâmoniyiki, ê-kîpimâmoniyiki, ê-kî-pimâmoniyiki]


  
  Verb - atoskah - help : # Ordinary TA verb - full paradigm
  
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: nitatoskahâw
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: kitatoskahâw
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: nitatoskahânân
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: kitatoskahânaw
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: kitatoskahâwâw
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+3SgO: atoskahêw
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+3SgO: atoskahêwak

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: nitatoskahâwak
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: kitatoskahâwak
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: nitatoskahânânak
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: kitatoskahânawak
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: kitatoskahâwâwak
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+3PlO: atoskahêw
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+3PlO: atoskahêwak

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg+4SgO: atoskahêyiwa
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg+4PlO: atoskahêyiwa     

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+1SgO: kitatoskahin
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+1PlO: kitatoskahinân
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+1PlO: kitatoskahinân
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+1SgO: kitatoskahinâwâw

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: nitatoskahik
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: kitatoskahik
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: nitatoskahikonân
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: kitatoskahikonaw
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: kitatoskahikowâw
     
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: nitatoskahikwak
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: kitatoskahikwak
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: nitatoskahikonânak
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: kitatoskahikonawak
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: kitatoskahikowâwak
     
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg+3SgO: atoskahik
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg+3PlO: atoskahikwak
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+5Sg+4SgO: atoskahikoyiwa

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+2SgO: kitatoskahitin
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+2SgO: kitatoskahitinân
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+2PlO: kitatoskahitinân
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+2PlO: kitatoskahitinânâw

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: [ê-atoskahak, êhatoskahak]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: [ê-atoskahat, êhatoskahat]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: [ê-atoskahâyâhk, êhatoskahâyâhk]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: [ê-atoskahâyahk, êhatoskahâyahk]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: [ê-atoskahâyêk, êhatoskahâyêk]

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: [ê-atoskahakik, êhatoskahakik]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: [ê-atoskahacik, êhatoskahacik]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: [ê-atoskahâyâhkik, êhatoskahâyâhkik]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: [ê-atoskahâyâhkok, êhatoskahâyâhkok]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: [ê-atoskahâyêkok, êhatoskahâyêkok]     

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+4SgO: [ê-atoskahât, êhatoskahât]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+4SgO: [ê-atoskahâcik, êhatoskahâcik]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+4PlO: [ê-atoskahât, êhatoskahât]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+4PlO: [ê-atoskahâcik, êhatoskahâcik]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg+5SgO: [ê-atoskahâyit, êhatoskahâyit]

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+1SgO: [ê-atoskahiyan, êhatoskahiyan]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+1PlO: [ê-atoskahiyâhk, êhatoskahiyâhk]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+1PlO: [ê-atoskahiyâhk, êhatoskahiyâhk]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+1SgO: [ê-atoskahiyêk, êhatoskahiyêk]

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: [ê-atoskahit, êhatoskahit]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: [ê-atoskahisk, êhatoskahisk]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: [ê-atoskahikoyâhk, êhatoskahikoyâhk]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: [ê-atoskahikoyahk, êhatoskahikoyahk]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: [ê-atoskahikoyek, êhatoskahikoyek]

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: [ê-atoskahiticik, êhatoskahiticik]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: [ê-atoskahiskik, êhatoskahiskik]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: [ê-atoskahikoyâhkik, êhatoskahikoyâhkik]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: [ê-atoskahikoyahkok, êhatoskahikoyahkok]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: [ê-atoskahikoyêkok, êhatoskahikoyêkok]

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg+3SgO: [ê-atoskahikot, êhatoskahikot]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg+3PlO: [ê-atoskahikocik, êhatoskahikocik]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg+4PlO: [ê-atoskahikoyit, êhatoskahikoyit]

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2SgO: [ê-atoskahitân, êhatoskahitân]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+2SgO: [ê-atoskahitâhk, êhatoskahitâhk]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+2PlO: [ê-atoskahitâhk, êhatoskahitâhk]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2PlO: [ê-atoskahitakok, êhatoskahitakok]
